Massachusetts, session 194th, H2241.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 18A of chapter 17 of the General Laws is hereby repealed. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 17 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 18A the following section:- 
Section 18B. (a) The following terms shall, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, 
have the following meanings:- 
“Accredited housing”, recovery housing that has been accredited by the bureau pursuant 
to section 18A. 
“Bureau”, the bureau of substance addiction services established in section 18. 

of 6 9  “Director”, the director of substance addiction services. 
“Impacted community”, a neighborhood that meets 1 or more of the following criteria: (i) 
the annual median household income is  not more than 65 per cent of the statewide annual 
median household income; (ii) minorities comprise 40 per cent or more of the population; (iii) 25 
per cent or more of households lack English language proficiency; (iv) minorities comprise 25 
per cent or more of the population and the annual median household income of the municipality 
in which the neighborhood is located does not exceed 150 per cent of the statewide annual 
median household income; or (v) the neighborhood contains more than 1 accredited housing or 
recovery housing building; provided, however, that for a neighborhood that does not meet said 
criteria, but a geographic portion of that neighborhood meets at least 1 criterion, the bureau may 
designate that geographic portion as an impacted community upon the petition of at least 10 
residents of the geographic portion of that neighborhood meeting any such criteria; provided 
further, that the bureau may determine that a neighborhood, including any geographic portion 
thereof, shall not be designated an impacted community upon finding that: (A) the annual 
median household income of that neighborhood is greater than 125 per cent of the statewide 
median household income; (B) a majority of persons age 25 and older in that neighborhood have 
a college education; (C) the neighborhood does not bear an unfair burden of accredited or 
recovery housing; and (D) the neighborhood has reasonable access to health and human service 
support systems for accredited or recovery housing. 
“Operator”, the lawful owner or lessor of accredited or recovery housing or a person 
employed and designated by the owner to have primary responsibility for the daily operation of 
such housing and for maintaining standards and conditions in such housing that create an 
environment supportive of substance use disorder recovery. 

of 6 32  “Recovery housing”, a residence, commonly known as a sober home, that provides or 
advertises as providing, an alcohol and drug free environment for people recovering from 
substance use disorders; provided, however, that, “Recovery housing” shall not include a 
halfway house, treatment unit or detoxification facility or any other facility licensed pursuant to 
section 7 of chapter 111E. 
(b)(1) The bureau shall determine the regional need for recovery housing throughout the 
commonwealth. The bureau shall conduct a survey of the total statewide capacity of current 
voluntary accredited housing pursuant to section 18A and any other housing meeting the 
definition of recovery housing, including: 
(i) locations of accredited housing and recovery housing by city, town and census 
block; 
(ii) the number of occupants in each home; and 
(iii) any municipal zoning, land use by-law or ordinance, or other restrictions on 
occupancy for such housing. 
(2) Upon review of the regional need for, and distribution of, accredited housing and 
recovery housing across the commonwealth, the bureau may, upon application of an operator 
pursuant to this section issue a determination of need permit to operate recovery housing in the 
commonwealth; provided however, that the bureau shall not issue a permit to locate recovery 
housing in an impacted community. 

of 6 51  (3) All residences that provide alcohol and drug free housing, or advertise as alcohol and 
drug free housing, shall apply for a determination of need permit from the bureau of substance 
addiction services. 
(4) An operator may apply for a permit for recovery housing, notwithstanding any local 
zoning by-law, ordinance or law to the contrary to the requirements of this section. Section 3 of 
chapter 40A shall not apply to any such permit. 
(d) An operator shall submit a permit application to the director that provides the 
following information: 
(i) the location of the recovery housing; 
(ii) the name, address, phone number and driver's license number of the operator; 
(ii) the name, address, phone number and driver's license number of the house 
manager of the recovery housing; 
(iii) a copy of the recovery housing’s rules and regulations; 
(iv) written intake procedures; 
(v) the relapse policy; 
(vi) an affirmation by the operator that only residents, other than the house 
manager, who are     persons with a disability as defined by state and federal law shall reside at 
the recovery housing; 
(vii) blank copies of all forms that all residents and potential residents are 
required to complete; 

of 6 71              (viii) the fee for the cost of processing of the application as annually determined 
by the secretary of administration and finance pursuant to section 3B of chapter 7. 
(e) A determination of need permit may be issued where the recovery housing is located 
in a non-impacted neighborhood and the recovery housing is at least 1,000 feet from any 
property that operates recovery housing or similar home or facility as measured from the 
property line. 
(f) An operator's permit shall not be valid for a location other than the property for which 
it is issued, unless and until the transfer of the permit is approved by the bureau. 
(g) An operator's permit shall not be transferred to any other person or entity. No 
operator's permit issued pursuant to this section shall be transferred or assigned or authorize any 
person or entity other than the person or entity named in the permit to operate the recovery 
housing named therein. 
(h) An operator's permit may be revoked upon a hearing by the bureau for failing to 
comply with the terms of the permit or for failing to comply with this section or any regulations 
promulgated thereto. An operator aggrieved of a permit revocation may appeal such revocation, 
which shall be heard in the superior court division of the trial court department in which the 
recovery housing is located, whose decision shall be final. 
(i)(1) An applicant for an operator's permit whose application for such a permit has been 
denied may not reapply for a permit for a period of 6 months from the date such notice of denial 
was issued. 

of 6 91  (2) A holder of a permit that has been cancelled, revoked or otherwise invalidated may 
not reapply for a permit for a period of 6 months from the date that such cancellation, revocation 
or invalidation became final. 
(j) The bureau shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this section. 
SECTION 3. The bureau shall begin accepting applications pursuant to section 18B of 
chapter 17 of the General Laws not later than 120 days after the effective date of this act. Any 
operator of recovery housing in existence on the effective date of this act shall apply for a permit 
pursuant to said section 18b of said chapter 17 not later than June 30, 2024. Any other entity 
seeking to operate recovery housing shall receive a permit pursuant to section 18B of chapter 17 
100 prior to operating such housing. 
101  SECTION 4. The bureau of substance addiction services shall promulgate regulations to 
102 implement section 18B of chapter 17 of the General Laws within 90 days of the passage of this 
103 act. 
104  SECTION 5. Section 1 shall take effect on June 30, 2026.